Hawaii statutes.
[§667-84] Confidentiality. Personal
financial information and other sensitive personal information, including
information describing an individual's finances, income, assets, liabilities,
net worth, bank balances, financial history or activities, or creditworthiness
which is disclosed by the parties in the course of the mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution program, shall be confidential and not subject to public
disclosure under chapter 92F or any other state law. [L
2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next